Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-552
Railways; crossings; safety regulations.

Cities of the second class and villages shall have power to regulate the crossing of railway tracks and the running of railway engines, cars, or trucks within the corporate limits of such city or village and to govern the speed of such engines, cars, or trucks, and to make any other and further provisions, rules, and restrictions to prevent accidents at crossings and on the tracks of railways.

Laws 1879, § 69, XXI, p. 215;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XXI, p. 183;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XXI, p. 174;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XXI, p. 302;

R.S.1913, § 5126;

C.S.1922, § 4301;

C.S.1929, § 17-450;

R.S.1943, § 17-552;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 177.

An ordinance limiting the speed of trains, even though they carry United States mail, within the city limits to ten miles per hour is not void as imposing an unreasonable restraint on interstate commerce. Peterson v. State of Nebraska, 79 Neb. 132, 112 N.W. 306 (1907).